Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,124
District or company; notice prior to meeting; requirements.

Any irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation district, rural water district, or mutual irrigation or canal company intending to file an application for transfer and a map with the Chief Water Officer under section 46-2,122 shall give notice prior to the meeting at which the application and map will be approved for filing. Notice shall be given in the manner provided in section 46-2,128.

Laws 1995, LB 99, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 156;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 140.